Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-703 General duties; relation
and liability to persons interested in estate; standing to sue.
(a) A personal representative is a fiduciary who shall observe the standards
of care applicable to trustees as described by section 560:7-302. A personal
representative is under a duty to settle and distribute the estate of the
decedent in accordance with the terms of any probated and effective will and
this chapter, and as expeditiously and efficiently as is consistent with the
best interests of the estate. The personal representative shall use the
authority conferred upon the personal representative by this chapter, the terms
of the will, if any, and any order in proceedings to which the personal
representative is party for the best interests of successors to the estate.

(b) A personal representative shall not be
surcharged for acts of administration or distribution if the conduct in
question was authorized at the time. Subject to other obligations of
administration, an informally probated will is authority to administer and
distribute the estate according to its terms. An order of appointment of a
personal representative, whether issued in informal or formal proceedings, is
authority to distribute apparently intestate assets to the heirs of the decedent
if, at the time of distribution, the personal representative is not aware of a
pending testacy proceeding, a proceeding to vacate an order entered in an
earlier testacy proceeding, a formal proceeding questioning the personal
representative's appointment or fitness to continue, or a supervised
administration proceeding. Nothing in this section affects the duty of the
personal representative to administer and distribute the estate in accordance
with the rights of claimants, the surviving spouse or reciprocal beneficiary,
any minor and dependent children and any pretermitted child of the decedent as
described elsewhere in this chapter.

(c) Except as to proceedings which do not
survive the death of the decedent, a personal representative of a decedent domiciled
in this State at the decedent's death has the same standing to sue and be sued
in the courts of this State and the courts of any other jurisdiction as the
decedent had immediately prior to death. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1; am L 1997, c
383, §19]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next